Louisiana, session 2026, HB983.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. A. The sum of Two Hundred Twenty-Nine Million Six Hundred Forty-
Seven Thousand Nine Hundred Ninety-Five and No/100 ($229,647,995) Dollars, or so much
thereof as may be necessary, is hereby appropriated to defray the expenses of the judiciary,
including the Supreme Court, Courts of Appeal, the District Courts, the Criminal District
Court of Orleans Parish, and of the other courts.
B. The total amount herein appropriated is hereby allocated to provide as follows:
03-8170 SUPREME COURT
Program Description: The Supreme Court has general supervisory jurisdiction over all lower courts.
It may establish procedural and administrative rules not in conflict with law and may assign a sitting or
retired judge to any court. The Supreme Court has sole authority to provide by rule for appointments of
attorneys as temporary or ad hoc judges. It considers applications for writs to review individual cases,
and has criminal and other appellate jurisdiction. The Supreme Court has exclusive original jurisdiction
of disciplinary proceedings against lawyers, recommendations of the Judiciary Commission of Louisiana
for the discipline of judges, and fact questions affecting its appellate jurisdiction. It has inherent authority
to regulate the legal profession and to promulgate and update the Code of Judicial Conduct. The court
also provides judicial training through the Judicial College and works to improve the administration of
justice.
FY 26 EOB FY 27 REC
01 Salaries of one (1) Chief Justice and
six (6) Associate Justices of the
Supreme Court, as provided by
R.S. 13:102 $ 1,282,315 $ 1,389,275
02 Salaries and other expenses of the
Supreme Court Proper and salary of
the Crier of the Supreme Court $ 12,756,202 $ 14,551,918
03 Expenses of Judicial Administrator's
Office and of the Judiciary
Commission provided for in Article V,
Section 25 of the Constitution of
Louisiana and under the provisions of
R.S. 13:32 et seq.
Page 1 of 10

HB NO. 983 ENROLLED
A. Expenses of Judicial
Administrator's Office $ 6,275,493 $ 7,231,002
Program Description: The Judicial Administrator's Office assists the Supreme Court in the
administration of the state court system. It staffs the Judicial Council and the Judiciary Commission of
Louisiana. Through the Judicial Council, it performs studies and makes recommendations for the creation
of new judgeships and for improving the administration of justice. The Judicial Administrator's Office
provides payroll and other fiscal services to the Judiciary, including the administration of a judicial
retirement system; support for the Supreme Court and Appellate Court human resource system; and
support for judicial branch reporting obligations. The Judicial Administrator's Office also manages the
ad hoc judgeship system, monitors cases under advisement, provides support for initiatives to ensure
access to the courts for limited English proficiency individuals; provides outreach services to state and
local courts, applies for and administers grants to improve judicial administration; and staffs the
Committee on Judicial Ethics. The Judicial Administrator’s office administers several programs, including
the Supreme Court Drug Court / Specialty Court Office, the Louisiana Protective Order Registry, and
CASA and FINS through the Division of Children and Families. The Judicial Administrator’s office also
provides staff support for the Louisiana Judicial College, and performs numerous legal services for the
Supreme Court and the Judiciary.
B. Expenses of Judiciary Commission $ 2,386,103 $ 3,300,240
Program Description: The Judiciary Commission of Louisiana is a constitutional body established under
Article V, Section 25 of the Constitution of 1974 to accept, screen, investigate, and prosecute complaints
of judicial misconduct. As part of its authority, it may recommend to the Supreme Court the censure,
suspension, removal from office, or involuntary retirement of any judge for ethical misconduct.
C. Statistical Reporting Systems $ 367,770 $ 385,212
D. Dues to National Center for
State Courts $ 186,000 $ 186,000
04 Louisiana Attorney Disciplinary
Board, as per Louisiana Supreme
Court Rule XIX $ 3,000 $ 3,000
05 Compensation and expenses of retired
judges assigned under Article V,
Section 5(A) of the Constitution of
Louisiana, be it more or less
estimated at $ 873,866 $ 1,008,236
06 Law Library of Louisiana for salaries,
services, supplies, maintenance, repairs,
and equipment $ 1,983,606 $ 2,194,758

Program Description: The Law Library of Louisiana serves the legal information needs of the state
judiciary, and is open to members of the bar and public.
07 Salaries and expenses of transferred
judges assigned under Article V,
Section 5(A) of the Constitution,
be it more or less estimated as $ 75,000 $ 78,750
08 Retirement pay for services rendered by
justices and judges of all courts, as
provided by R.S. 11:1358 $ 539,000 $ 458,935
09 Pensions for widows of justices and
judges of all courts, as provided by
R.S. 11:1371 and R.S. 11:1381, be it
more or less estimated at $ 715,000 $ 729,300
10 Judicial College $ 271,508 $ 372,976
Page 2 of 10

HB NO. 983 ENROLLED
Program Description: The Judicial College was established by order of the Supreme Court in 1976 to
provide continuing legal education to Louisiana judges.
11 State contribution to judicial
retirement provided for in Article V,
Section 23 of the Constitution and
R.S. 11:551 et seq., be it more or
less estimated at $ 19,638,283 $ 20,034,525
12 Civil commitment matters as
required by R.S. 28:54 $ 394,520 $ 394,520
13 Paul M. Hebert Law Center for
expenses of storage of appellate
court records $ 60,000 $ 60,000
14 Funding for statewide operations of the
Louisiana Protective Order Registry
(R.S. 46:2136.2) under the Case
Management Information System $ 1,598,319 $ 1,829,518
15 Information Technology $ 2,199,682 $ 2,377,527
16 Operational expenses of
the Families in Need of Services
Program (FINS) $ 3,606,522 $ 3,724,483
Program Description: The mission of the FINS Assistance Program is to assist local FINS processes by
developing and implementing a needs-based allocation formula; developing, implementing, and mandating
the use of a uniform data system for tracking, managing, and reporting FINS informal cases; developing
and mandating the use of programmatic standards; developing, implementing, and reporting performance
indicators and measures; requiring and monitoring periodic fiscal reports and financial accountability;
and, generally supervising and assisting local FINS processes in other ways.

17 Louisiana Drug and Specialty Courts $ 21,235,993 $ 21,353,718
Program Description: Louisiana Drug and Specialty Courts, such as Drug/DWI Treatment Courts,
authorized in 1977 by R.S. 13:5301-5304; Reentry Courts, authorized in 2010 by R.S. 13:5401; Mental
Health Courts, authorized in 2013 by R.S. 13:5353 - 5358; Swift and Certain Program, authorized by R.S.
13:5371; and Veterans Treatment Courts, authorized in 2014 by R.S. 13:5361 - 5368, are proven and
effective alternatives to traditional criminal justice interventions. These programs provide integrated
treatment for substance use and mental health disorders, including the appropriate use of sanctions and
incentives along with case management, to place participants in need of services into appropriate
community-based and judicially supervised rehabilitation programs. Clients are regularly tested and
monitored for compliance with educational, employment, and treatment requirements pursuant to current
best practices and the proven national model.
18 Court Appointed Special Advocates $ 8,383,456 $ 8,986,012
Program Description: The purpose of the CASA Assistance Program is to promote timely placement of
children in need of care in permanent, safe and stable homes, in accordance with the provisions of
Children's Code articles 424-426. Services are provided through local CASA programs which recruit,
screen, train and supervise community advocates. Upon appointment by the trial judge, qualified
advocates serve children by providing independent factual information to the judge, advocating for the best
interest of the children, monitoring cases to which they have been assigned, and advising and assisting the
judge in the determination of the best interest of the children involved.
19 Judges' supplemental compensation
R.S. 13:10.3, be it more or less
estimated at $ 7,785,844 $ 7,785,844
Program Description: The Judges' Supplemental Compensation Fund was established by the Legislature
in 1985 to fund salary supplements and salary-related expenses to judges and commissioners. The funding
source is a non-refundable filing fee assessed on civil filings as provided in R.S. 13:10.3.
20 Case Management Information System,
Article 887(F) of the Code of Criminal
Page 3 of 10

HB NO. 983 ENROLLED
Procedure, be it more or less
estimated at $ 4,057,080 $ 4,057,080
Program Description: The Case Management Information System (CMIS) was created by the Supreme
Court in 1993 to provide a statewide information system for tracking and managing criminal, civil,
juvenile, traffic, and appellate cases as well as protective orders. Data is received from courts statewide,
transferred to the CMIS repository, and made available to courts and executive branch agencies.
Additional information will also be available from the Department of Public Safety & Corrections. CMIS
is funded from a court cost assessed on all criminal and traffic convictions as provided under
C.Cr.P.887(F).
TOTAL EXPENDITURES: $ 96,674,562 $ 102,492,829
MEANS OF FINANCE:
State General Fund (Direct) $ 75,438,788 $ 81,257,055
State General Fund by:
Interagency Transfers $ 9,392,850 $ 9,392,850
Statutory Dedications:
Judges' Supplemental Compensation
Fund $ 7,785,844 $ 7,785,844
Trial Court Case Management
Information Fund $ 4,057,080 $ 4,057,080
TOTAL MEANS OF FINANCING $ 96,674,562 $ 102,492,829
03-8171 COURTS OF APPEAL
Program Description: The five courts of appeal, domiciled in Baton Rouge, Shreveport, Lake Charles,
New Orleans, and Gretna, have supervisory jurisdiction over all cases arising within their respective
circuits, subject to the general supervisory jurisdiction of the Supreme Court. Each court of appeal also
has appellate jurisdiction over all civil matters, all matters appealed from family and juvenile courts, and
all criminal cases triable by a jury which arise within its circuit, except for those cases appealable directly
to the Supreme Court or to the district courts.
FY 26 EOB FY 27 REC
01 Salaries of five (5) Chief Judges
and forty-eight (48) Judges of
the Courts of Appeal, R.S. 13:311 $ 9,022,841 $ 9,959,881
02 Salaries and expenses of operation
and maintenance of the Court of
appeal, First Circuit $ 11,466,595 $ 14,190,714
03 Salaries and expenses of operation
and maintenance of the Court of
appeal, Second Circuit $ 6,494,697 $ 7,640,157
04 Salaries and expenses of operation
and maintenance of the Court of
appeal, Third Circuit $ 9,876,889 $ 11,520,614
05 Salaries and expenses of operation
and maintenance of the Court of
Appeal, Fourth Circuit $ 9,216,537 $ 10,845,175
06 Salaries and expenses of operation
and maintenance of the Court of
Appeal, Fifth Circuit $ 6,798,850 $ 8,593,725
TOTAL EXPENDITURES: $ 52,876,409 $ 62,750,266
Page 4 of 10

HB NO. 983 ENROLLED
MEANS OF FINANCE:
State General Fund (Direct) $ 52,876,409 $ 62,750,266
TOTAL MEANS OF FINANCING $ 52,876,409 $ 62,750,266
03-8172 DISTRICT COURTS - SALARIES AND OFFICE EXPENSES AS
REQUIRED BY STATUTE
Program Description: There are forty-one district courts in Louisiana that have general jurisdiction over
all matters within their territorial limits, except in those judicial districts (the 1st, the 19th, and the 24th
Judicial Districts) where family and juvenile courts have exclusive jurisdiction over certain types of cases
and except in Orleans Parish where there are separate courts exercising civil, criminal, and juvenile
jurisdictions. In certain cases, the forty-one general jurisdiction courts have concurrent jurisdiction with
justices of the peace and parish courts. The district courts generally have appellate jurisdiction of
criminal cases tried by city, parish, municipal, traffic, and mayors' courts, except in certain cases. The
district courts also have appellate jurisdiction over justices of the peace in parishes where no parish courts
exist. The Civil District Court of Orleans Parish has jurisdiction of all civil cases in that parish. The
Criminal District Court of Orleans Parish has jurisdiction over all criminal cases in that parish. It also
has general supervisory jurisdiction over the municipal and traffic court in Orleans Parish. The Family
Court of East Baton Rouge Parish has exclusive jurisdiction of many domestic cases in that parish. The
four juvenile courts located in Caddo, East Baton Rouge, Jefferson, and Orleans parishes have exclusive
jurisdiction of juvenile cases in their respective parishes.
FY 26 EOB FY 27 REC
01 Salaries of two hundred twenty-one
(221) District Judges as provided
by R.S. 13:691 $ 35,543,471 $ 39,113,459
02 Office and travel expenses of District
Judges as provided by R.S. 13:698
and R.S. 13:694, respectively $ 1,448,650 $ 1,471,300

03 Salaries of two (2) Court Reporters
of the Twentieth Judicial District Court,
including retirement contributions, as
provided by R.S. 13:966.1 $ 114,514 $ 114,979
04 Clerk of Civil District Court, Orleans
Parish, as provided by R.S. 13:1212(A) $ 10,000 $ 10,000
05 State share of Group, Workers'
Compensation, General Liability, and
Property Insurance Premiums as
provided by R.S. 42:851 $ 8,663,498 $ 9,187,615
06 Salaries of two (2) commissioners of
the Nineteenth Judicial District and
one (1) commissioner of the Fifteenth
Judicial District as provided by
R.S. 13:712 and R.S. 13:715,
respectively $ 650,843 $ 675,343
07 Office expenses for the Judicial
Expense Fund of the Nineteenth Judicial
District Court as provided by
R.S. 13:711-713 $ 483,945 $ 616,348
08 Office expenses for the Judicial
Expense Fund of the Fifteenth
Judicial District Court as provided
by R.S. 13:714-716 $ 307,831 $ 321,720
09 Law Clerk, Twentieth Judicial District
Court as provided by Act 747 of 1977 $ 49,311 $ 49,311
Page 5 of 10

HB NO. 983 ENROLLED
10 For the expenses of the Judicial Expense
Fund, Tenth Judicial District Court as
provided by Act 57 of 2006 $ 35,000 $ 35,000
SUBTOTAL $ 47,307,063 $ 51,595,075
11 Criminal Court - Parish of Orleans
Program Description: The Criminal District Court for the Parish of Orleans has
exclusive jurisdiction of the trial and punishment of all crimes, misdemeanors, and
offenses committed within the parish of Orleans, if the jurisdiction is not vested by law
in some other court. The court, through its magistrate and with assistance from its
commissioners, has the power of committing magistrates in all felony charges and the
power to hold preliminary examinations, with authority to bail or discharge, or to hold
for trial, in all cases before the court. The court has appellate jurisdiction of all cases
tried before the Municipal and Traffic Court of New Orleans and has general
supervisory jurisdiction over these courts.
A. State's share of group insurance
for personnel of Criminal Court
as provided by R.S. 42:851 $ 849,145 $ 904,573
B. Salaries of thirteen (13) minute
clerks as provided by R.S.
13:1373.1 $ 294,775 $ 278,349
C. Salaries of twenty-six (26) court
reporters as provided by R.S.
13:1373.1 $ 460,845 $ 438,052
D. Salaries of four (4) commissioners
of Criminal Court, Orleans Parish,
including related benefits as
provided by R.S. 13:1347 $ 567,412 $ 578,938
E. Office and travel expenses of
commissioners as provided by
R.S. 13:1347 $ 10,600 $ 10,600
F. Salaries of four (4) minute clerks,
one for each commissioner
as provided by R.S. 13:1347 $ 79,683 $ 76,113
G. Salaries of four (4) court reporters,
one for each commissioner
as provided by R.S. 13:1347 $ 58,103 $ 55,854
H. Salaries of Judicial Administrator,
and assistants, including
related benefits $ 1,102,944 $ 1,155,866
I. Salaries of thirteen (13) law clerks $ 785,166 $ 797,217
J. Salaries of four (4) secretaries $ 227,400 $ 237,679
K. Sanity Commissions $ 58,855 $ 60,209
L. Board of Jury Commissioners $ 449,742 $ 467,633
SUBTOTAL $ 4,944,670 $ 5,061,083
Page 6 of 10

HB NO. 983 ENROLLED
12 Juvenile and Family Court Judges
A. Salaries of twelve (12) Juvenile
Court Judges as provided by
R.S. 13:691 $ 2,110,850 $ 2,124,769
B. Salaries of four (4) Family Court
Judges as provided by R.S. 13:691 $ 649,492 $ 708,256
C. Office and travel expenses of Juvenile
and Family Court Judges as
provided by R.S. 13:698 and
R.S. 13:694, respectively $ 97,750 $ 92,000
SUBTOTAL $ 2,858,092 $ 2,925,025
TOTAL EXPENDITURES (District Courts): $ 55,109,825 $ 59,581,183
MEANS OF FINANCE:
State General Fund (Direct) $ 55,109,825 $ 59,581,183
TOTAL MEANS OF FINANCING
(District Courts): $ 55,109,825 $ 59,581,183
03-8173 OTHER COURTS - SALARIES AND OFFICE EXPENSES AS
REQUIRED BY STATUTE
Program Description: The category includes forty-seven city courts, one municipal and traffic court
(New Orleans), and one parish court (Ascension Parish).
FY 26 EOB FY 27 REC
01 Salaries of sixty (60) City Court
Judges as provided by R.S. 13:1875 $ 3,145,602 $ 3,432,068
02 Salaries of seven (7) Municipal and
Traffic and one (1) Parish Court
Judge as provided by R.S. 13:2492
and 2563.5, respectively $ 455,923 $ 497,443
TOTAL EXPENDITURES (OTHER COURTS
REQUIRED BY STATUTE) $ 3,601,525 $ 3,929,511
MEANS OF FINANCE:
State General Fund (Direct) $ 3,601,525 $ 3,929,511
TOTAL MEANS OF FINANCE (OTHER
COURTS REQUIRED BY STATUTE) $ 3,601,525 $ 3,929,511
03-8174 OTHER COURTS - SALARIES AND OFFICE EXPENSES NOT
REQUIRED BY STATUTE
FY 26 EOB FY 27 REC
01 Orleans Parish Juvenile Protective
Care Monitoring Program $ 645,551 $ 700,208
Program Description: The program tracks and maintains child abuse and neglect cases in the Orleans
Parish Juvenile Court. It also provides assistance in support of the Families in Need of Services Program.
02 Orleans Parish Juvenile Court
Reporters $ 121,580 $ 130,698
Page 7 of 10

HB NO. 983 ENROLLED
03 For the expenses of the Judges'
Assistance Program $ 61,877 $ 63,300
Program Description: The Judges' Assistance Program provides counseling and other assistance to
judges with substance abuse problems.
TOTAL EXPENDITURES (OTHER COURTS
NOT REQUIRED BY STATUTE) $ 829,008 $ 894,206
MEANS OF FINANCE:
State General Fund (Direct) $ 829,008 $ 894,206
TOTAL MEANS OF FINANCE (OTHER
COURTS NOT REQUIRED BY
STATUTE) $ 829,008 $ 894,206
Section 2.A. The Chief Justice of the Louisiana Supreme Court, or his duly authorized
and appointed agent, shall warrant the state treasurer for the allocations herein provided, or
for so much thereof as may be necessary. The aforesaid warrant shall be paid out of the state
general fund, and the state treasurer shall pay said warrant by preference over all other
warrants, except warrants for the salaries of constitutional officers of the state and warrants
for expenses of the legislature, which shall be concurrent with the warrant provided by this
Act.
B. The funds drawn as provided herein shall be deposited in the name of the judiciary
in an approved bank that has been selected by the Louisiana Supreme Court and is located
in the state.
C. Any funds herein allocated to the judiciary, any portion of the funds previously
appropriated to the judiciary, other revenue of the judiciary or its agencies, and interest
earnings are hereby appropriated and may be used to defray the expenses of the judiciary;
however, all funds remaining unexpended or unencumbered shall be returnable to the state
general fund on or before September 1, 2027.
D. For Fiscal Year 2026-2027, any surpluses occurring in the appropriations made in
this Act may be transferred from one agency or line-item to another during the fiscal year
in accordance with the rules of the Judicial Budgetary Control Board, or as approved by the
Louisiana Supreme Court.
E. The adjustment to be made in the salaries of judicial employees and the number of
authorized positions of the judiciary shall be as decided by the judicial agency affected,
subject to the approval of the Judicial Budgetary Control Board, or as approved by the
Louisiana Supreme Court.
Page 8 of 10

HB NO. 983 ENROLLED
F. The program descriptions contained in this Act are not part of the law and are not
enacted into law by virtue of their inclusion in this Act.
G. The inclusion in this Act of staff salaries and benefits for lower court or other judicial
branch agency employees shall not be deemed to create or impose any obligation upon the
State of Louisiana judicial branch, the Louisiana Supreme Court, the Judicial Budgetary
Control Board, or the Louisiana Supreme Court Judicial Administrator's Office relative to
the administration of pay, retirement, or other benefits to any such employees. Accordingly,
the State of Louisiana judicial branch, the Louisiana Supreme Court, the Judicial Budgetary
Control Board, and the Louisiana Supreme Court Judicial Administrator's Office are not to
be considered the "employer" or "employing agency" of lower court or other judicial agency
employees whose staff salaries and other benefits are included in this Act.
Section 3. A. The appropriations, and the allocations of such appropriations, from the
State General Fund (Direct) contained in Section 1 of this Act shall be reduced by a total
amount of Twenty Million Five Hundred Fifty-Six Thousand Six Hundred Sixty-Six
($20,556,666) Dollars, pursuant to a plan adopted by the Judicial Budgetary Control Board
or the Louisiana Supreme Court.
B. The appropriations, and the allocations of such appropriations, from the State General
Fund (Direct) contained in Section 1 of this Act shall be increased by a total amount of
Eighteen Million Two Hundred Sixty-Eight Thousand Twelve and No/100 ($18,268,012)
Dollars to be distributed as follows: Five Million Thirty-One Thousand ($5,031,000) Dollars
for Families in Need of Services; Six Million Four Hundred Eight-Three Thousand Ninety-
Six ($6,483,096) Dollars for an adjustment to the staff pay plan; and Six Million Seven
Hundred Fifty-Three Thousand Nine Hundred Sixteen ($6,753,916) Dollars for a salary
increases for justices of the supreme court and judges of the courts of appeal, district courts,
juvenile and family courts, and other courts.
Section 4. The sum of Five Million and No/100 ($5,000,000) Dollars is hereby
appropriated from the State General Fund by Statutory Dedications out of the Criminal
Justice Priority Fund to the Louisiana Supreme Court for the Integrated Criminal Justice
Information System (ICJIS) in the event that Senate Bill No. 141 of the 2026 Regular
Legislative Session of the Legislature is enacted into law.
Page 9 of 10

HB NO. 983 ENROLLED
Section 5. The sum of Eight Hundred Ninety-Two Thousand Ninety-Three and No/100
($892,093) Dollars is hereby appropriated from the State General Fund by Statutory
Dedications out of the Criminal Justice Priority Fund to the Louisiana Supreme Court for
the Integrated Criminal Justice Information System (ICJIS) in the event that Senate Bill No.
141 of the 2026 Regular Legislative Session of the Legislature is enacted into law.
Section 6. This Act shall become effective on July 1, 2026; if vetoed by the governor
and subsequently approved by the legislature, this Act shall become effective on July 1,
2026, or on the day following such approval by the legislature, whichever is later.
COMPARATIVE STATEMENT
In accordance with R.S. 39:51(D), the following represents a comparative statement for each
Court and program. The existing operating budget for FY 2025-2026 is compared to the
appropriations for FY 2026-2027 as contained in the original bill.
Existing Operating Budget Appropriation Request
Courts and Programs FY 2025-2026 FY 2026-2027
By Expenditure:
Supreme Court $ 96,674,562 $ 102,492,829
Courts of Appeal $ 52,876,409 $ 62,750,266
District Courts $ 55,109,825 $ 59,581,183
Other Courts (statutory) $ 3,601,525 $ 3,929,511
Other Programs (non-statutory) $ 829,008 $ 894,206
Reduction $ 0 $ (20,556,666)
Addition $ 0 $ 18,268,012
Total Expenditures $ 209,091,329 $ 227,359,341
By Means of Finance:
Total General Fund (Direct) $ 187,855,555 $ 208,412,221
Reduction General Fund (Direct) $ 0 $ (20,556,666)
Additional General Fund (Direct) $ 0 $ 18,268,012
Total Interagency Transfers $ 9,392,850 $ 9,392,850
Total Statutory Dedications $ 11,842,924 $ 11,842,9244
Total Funding $ 209,091,329 $ 227,359,341
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 10 of 10